Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201670-1028
Electric transmission line approved for construction in regional transmission organization transmission plan; notice to board; failure to provide notice; effect.

(1) If an electric transmission line has been approved for construction in a regional transmission organization transmission plan, the incumbent electric transmission owner of the existing electric transmission facilities to which the electric transmission line will connect shall give notice to the board, in writing, within ninety days after such approval, if it intends to construct, own, and maintain the electric transmission line. If no notice is provided, the incumbent electric transmission owner shall surrender its first right to construct, own, and maintain the electric transmission line and any other incumbent electric transmission owner may file an application for the electric transmission line under section 70-1012. Within twenty-four months after such notice, the incumbent electric transmission owner shall file an application with the board pursuant to section 70-1012.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Electric transmission line means any line and related facilities connecting to existing electric transmission facilities for transmitting electric energy at a voltage of one hundred kilovolts or greater, other than a line solely for connecting an electric generation facility to facilities owned by an electric supplier; and

(b) Incumbent electric transmission owner means an entity that: (i) Is an electric supplier; (ii) is a member of a regional transmission organization; and (iii) owns and operates electric transmission lines at a voltage of one hundred kilovolts or greater.

Laws 2013, LB388, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB824, § 12.
July 21, 2016